Utah statutes.
16-16-1503.   Notice and action on disposition of assets.
For a limited cooperative association to dispose of assets under Section
16-16-1502:
(1)  a majority of the board of directors, or a greater percentage if required
by the organic rules, must approve the proposed disposition; and
(2)  the board of directors must call a members meeting to consider the
proposed disposition, hold the meeting not later than 90 days after approval
of the proposed disposition by the board, and mail or otherwise transmit or
deliver in a record to each member:
(a)  the terms of the proposed disposition;
(b)  a recommendation that the members approve the disposition, or if the
board determines that because of conflict of interest or other special
circumstances it should not make a favorable recommendation, the basis for
that determination;
(c)  a statement of any condition of the board's submission of the proposed
disposition to the members; and
(d)  notice of the meeting at which the proposed disposition will be
considered, which must be given in the same manner as notice of a special
meeting of members.
